Hawaii statutes.
[§553A-6] Other transfer by fiduciary.
(a) Subject to subsection (c), a personal representative or trustee may make
an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the
benefit of a minor pursuant to section 553A-9, in the absence of a will or
under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

(b) Subject to subsection (c), a conservator
may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian
for the benefit of the minor pursuant to section 553A-9.

(c) A transfer under subsection (a) or (b) may
be made only if:

(1) The personal representative, trustee, or
conservator considers the transfer to be in the best interest of the minor;

(2) The transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent
with provisions of the applicable will, trust agreement, or other governing
instrument; and

(3) The transfer is authorized by the court if it
exceeds $10,000 in value. [L 1985, c 91, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Transfers, see HPR rule 111.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next